Utah statutes.
64-13d-107.   Facility construction -- Housing out-of-state inmates.

(1)  A contractor may not expand its original housing capacity without the approval of the:

(a)  Legislature; and

(b)  county or municipal legislative body within whose jurisdiction the facility is located.

(2)  A contractor may not incarcerate out-of-state inmates in a facility operated in the state, except in accordance with any interstate compact of which Utah is a party.



Enacted by Chapter 288, 1999 General Session

